Hawaii statutes.
§454F-17 Prohibited practices. It
shall be a violation of this chapter for a licensee or person subject to this
chapter to:

(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device,
or artifice to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person;

(2) Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice
related to mortgage loan origination activities toward any person;

(3) Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

(4) Solicit or enter into any contract with a
borrower or an applicant for a residential mortgage loan that provides in
substance that the person or individual subject to this chapter may earn a fee
or commission through "best efforts" to obtain a residential mortgage
loan even though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower or applicant for
a residential mortgage loan;

(5) Solicit, advertise, or enter into a contract for
specific interest rates, points, or other financing terms unless the terms are
actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising, or contracting;

(6) Conduct any business covered by this chapter
without holding a valid license as required under this chapter, or assist or
aid and abet any person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a
valid license as required under this chapter;

(7) Fail to make disclosures as required by this
chapter and any other applicable state or federal law including rules or
regulations adopted pursuant to state or federal law;

(8) Fail to comply with this chapter or any order or
rule issued or adopted under the authority of this chapter, or fail to comply
with any other state or federal law, including the rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to state or federal law applicable to any business authorized
or conducted pursuant to this chapter;

(9) Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive
statement or representation, including with regard to the rates, points, or
other financing terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan, or engage
in bait and switch advertising;

(10) Negligently or knowingly make any false statement
or provide any misleading information or knowingly and wilfully make any
omission of material fact in connection with any information or reports filed
with a governmental agency or NMLS, including an application for a license
under this chapter, or in connection with any examination or investigation
conducted by the commissioner or another government agency;

(11) Make any payment, threat, or promise, directly or
indirectly, to any person for the purposes of influencing the independent
judgment of the person in connection with a residential mortgage loan, or make
any payment, threat, or promise, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of a
property for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the
appraiser with respect to the value of a property;

(12) Cause or require a borrower to obtain property
insurance coverage in an amount that exceeds the replacement cost of the
improvements as established by the property insurer;

(13) Fail to truthfully account for moneys belonging
to a party to a residential mortgage loan;

(14) Deliver a misleading or deceptive communication
or advertisement, whether written, electronic, or oral, when marketing or
soliciting a residential mortgage loan; provided that:

(A) A communication or advertisement that
uses the name or trademark of a financial institution as defined in section
412:1-109 or its affiliates or subsidiaries, or infers that the communication
or advertisement is from, endorsed by, is related to, or is the responsibility
of the financial institution is a misleading or deceptive communication; and

(B) Advertising that a specific interest
rate, points, or financial terms are available when the rates, points, or
financial terms are not actually available is a misleading or deceptive communication;

(15) Fill in or complete any blank on a final
residential mortgage loan application that requests material information
including financial information without adequate supporting documentation
provided by the borrower;

(16) Fill in or complete any blank on any mortgage or
note evidencing or securing the residential mortgage loan which relates to the
amount, interest rate, term, or monthly payment of the residential mortgage
loan;

(17) Originate a residential mortgage loan based
primarily on the current market value of the borrower's collateral rather than
on the borrower's ability to repay the loan according to its terms; provided
that the sale of the property is made to a bona fide buyer; and provided
further that this paragraph shall not apply to a reverse mortgage as defined
under title 12 C.F.R. section 1026.33;

(18) Advertise terms of a residential mortgage loan in
violation of title 12 C.F.R. section 1026.16 or 1026.24; or

(19) Encourage a borrower to misrepresent, inflate, or
fabricate the source or amount of a borrower's actual income or assets in the
application or underwriting process for a residential mortgage loan. [L Sp
2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §22; am L 2011, c 194, §12; am L 2013, c
168, §20; am L 2016, c 122, §15]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next